Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.452

Mental health training.

(1) Beginning one year after *December 6, 2018, all law enforcement officers in the state of Washington must receive mental health training. Law enforcement officers beginning employment after *December 6, 2018, must successfully complete such training within the first fifteen months of employment. The commission shall set the date by which other law enforcement officers must successfully complete such training.

(2) All law enforcement officers shall periodically receive continuing mental health training to update their knowledge about mental health issues and associated legal requirements, and to update and practice skills for interacting with people with mental health issues.

(3) The commission shall set training requirements through the procedures in RCW 43.101.455.

[ 2019 c 1 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 940); ( 2018 c 11 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 940) repealed by 2019 c 4 s 8).]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "December 6, 2018" has been substituted for "the effective date of this section." The effective date of 2018 c 11 was June 7, 2018, and the effective date of 2019 c 1 was December 6, 2018. See Eyman v. Wyman, 191 Wn.2d 581, 424 P.3d 1183 (2018).

Short title—Intent—Liberal construction—Subject—2019 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 940): See notes following RCW 43.101.450.

Rule making—2019 c 4; 2019 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 940): See note following RCW 43.101.455.